Hawaii, session 2025, GM1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 707-711, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows:
"(1) A person commits the offense of assault in the second
degree if the person:
Intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly causes
substantial bodily injury to another;
(b) Recklessly causes serious bodily injury to another;
Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a
correctional worker, as defined in section 710-
1031(2), who is engaged in the performance of duty or
who is within a correctional facility;
(d) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to
another with a dangerous instrument;
Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to an
educational worker who is engaged in the performance
of duty or who is within an educational facility. For
the purposes of this paragraph, "educational worker
means any administrator, specialist, counselor.
DEF-06(25)

Page 2
S .B. NO.Btt
teacher, or employee of the department of education or
an employee of a charter school; a person who is a
volunteer, as defined in section 90-1, in a school
program, activity, or function that is established,
sanctioned, or approved by the department of
education; or a person hired by the department of
education on a contractual basis and engaged in
carrying out an educational function;
(f) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to any
emergency medical services provider who is engaged in
the performance of duty. For the purposes of this
paragraph, "emergency medical services provider" means
emergency medical services personnel, as defined in
section 321-222, and physicians, physician's
assistants, nurses, nurse practitioners, certified
registered nurse anesthetists, respiratory therapists,
laboratory technicians, radiology technicians, and
social workers, providing services in the emergency
room of a hospital;
(g) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a
person employed at a state-operated or -contracted
mental health facility. For the purposes of this
DEF-06(25)

Page 3
S .B. NO.
paragraph, "a person employed at a state-operated or -
contracted mental health facility" includes health
care professionals as defined in section 451D-2,
administrators, orderlies, security personnel,
volunteers, and any other person who is engaged in the
performance of a duty at a state-operated or -
contracted mental health facility;
(h) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a
person who:
(i) The defendant has been restrained from, by order
of any court, including an ex parte order,
contacting, threatening, or physically abusing
pursuant to chapter 586; or
(ii ) Is being protected by a police officer ordering
the defendant to leave the premises of that
protected person pursuant to section 709-906(4),
during the effective period of that order;
(i) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to any
firefighter or water safety officer who is engaged in
the performance of duty. For the purposes of this
paragraph, "firefighter" has the same meaning as in
section 710-1012 and "water safety officer" means any
DEF-06(25)

Page 4
S .B. NO.
public servant employed, by the United States, the
State, or any county as a lifeguard or person
authorized to conduct water rescue or ocean safety
functions;
(j) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a
person who is engaged in the performance of duty at a
health care facility as defined in section 323D-2.
For purposes of this paragraph, "a person who is
engaged in the performance of duty at a health care
facility" includes health care professionals as
defined in section 451D-2, physician assistants,
surgical assistants, advanced practice registered
nurses, nurse aides, respiratory therapists,
laboratory technicians, and radiology technicians;
(k) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a
person who is engaged in providing home health care
services, as defined in section 431:lOH-201;
(1) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a
person, employed or contracted to work by a mutual
benefit society, as defined in section 432:1-104, to
provide case management services to an individual in a
hospital, health care provider's office, or home,
DEF-06(25)

Page 5
S .B. NO.JS^
while that person is engaged in the performance of
those services;
(m) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a
person who is sixty years of age or older and the age
of the injured person is known or reasonably should be
known to the person causing the injury; [ea?]
(n) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a
sports official who is engaged in the lawful discharge
of the sports official's duties. For the purposes of
this paragraph, "sports official" and "lawful
discharge of the sports official's duties" have the
same meaning as in section 706-605.6 [—] ; or
(o) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a
national guard member who is engaged in the
performance of duty. For purposes of this paragraph,
"national guard member" means a member of the national
guard on any duty or service done under or in
pursuance of an order or call of the governor or the
President of the United States or any proper authority
as provided by law."
DEF-06(25)

Page 6
S B. NO.JSii
SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

INTRODUCED BY:
BY REQUEST
DEF-06(25)

S.B. NO. 1382
APPROVED this 10th day of April ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.No. 1382
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAFI
Date: March 4, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: MAR 2 7 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the House
of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of HawaiT, Regular Session of
2025.
Speaker, House of Representatives
Clerk, House of Representatives
973